Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-830
Permanent certificated employee; evidence of professional growth required.

Every six years permanent certificated employees shall give evidence of professional growth. Six semester hours of college credit shall be accepted as evidence of professional growth or, in the alternative, such other activities as are approved by the school board, which may include, but are not limited to, educational travel, professional publications, or work on educational committees.

Laws 1982, LB 259, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,113;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 460.